Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.052

Powers and duties of agency—Application to higher education, legislature, and judiciary.

(1) The agency shall:

(a) Make available information services to public agencies and public benefit nonprofit corporations;

(b) Establish rates and fees for services provided by the agency;

(c) Develop a billing rate plan for a two-year period to coincide with the budgeting process. The rate plan must be subject to review at least annually by the office of financial management. The rate plan must show the proposed rates by each cost center and show the components of the rate structure as mutually determined by the agency and the office of financial management. The rate plan and any adjustments to rates must be approved by the office of financial management;

(d) Develop a detailed business plan for any service or activity to be contracted under RCW 41.06.142(11)(b);

(e) Develop plans for the agency's achievement of statewide goals and objectives set forth in the state strategic information technology plan required under RCW 43.105.220;

(f) Enable the standardization and consolidation of information technology infrastructure across all state agencies to support enterprise-based system development and improve and maintain service delivery;

(g) Prepare and lead the implementation of a strategic direction and enterprise architecture for information technology for state government;

(h) Establish standards and policies for the consistent and efficient operation of information technology services throughout state government;

(i) Establish statewide enterprise architecture that will serve as the organizing standard for information technology for state agencies;

(j) Educate and inform state managers and policymakers on technological developments, industry trends and best practices, industry benchmarks that strengthen decision making and professional development, and industry understanding for public managers and decision makers; and

(k) Perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

(2) In the case of institutions of higher education, the powers of the agency and the provisions of this chapter apply to business and administrative applications but do not apply to: (a) Academic and research applications; and (b) medical, clinical, and health care applications, including the business and administrative applications for such operations. However, institutions of higher education must disclose to the agency any proposed academic applications that are enterprise-wide in nature relative to the needs and interests of other institutions of higher education. Institutions of higher education shall provide to the director sufficient data and information on proposed expenditures on business and administrative applications to permit the director to evaluate the proposed expenditures pursuant to RCW 43.88.092(3).

(3) The legislature and the judiciary, which are constitutionally recognized as separate branches of government, are strongly encouraged to coordinate with the agency and participate in shared services initiatives and the development of enterprise-based strategies, where appropriate. Legislative and judicial agencies of the state may consult with the director on proposed information technology expenditures, where appropriate, to allow the director to provide feedback on an advisory basis.

[ 2024 c 54 s 5; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 104; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 804; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 16; 2000 c 180 s 1; 1999 c 80 s 6; 1993 c 281 s 53; 1992 c 20 s 10; 1990 c 208 s 7; 1987 c 504 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Severability—Captions not law—1992 c 20: See notes following RCW 43.105.025.